Washington statutes.
RCW 6.17.130

Sheriff's execution and service of writ—Sale date—Notice to judgment debtor.

When the writ of execution is against the property of the judgment debtor, the sheriff shall set the date of sale and serve on the debtor, in the same manner as service of a summons in a civil action, or cause to be transmitted by both regular mail and certified mail, return receipt requested, a copy of the writ, together with copies of RCW 6.13.010, 6.13.030, and 6.13.040 if real property is to be levied on, or copies of RCW 6.15.010 and 6.15.060 if personal property is to be levied on, and shall at the time of service, or with the mailing, notify the judgment debtor of the date of sale. If service on the judgment debtor must be effected by publication, only the following notice need be published under the caption of the case:

To . . . . . ., Judgment Debtor:

A writ of execution has been issued in the above-captioned case, directed to the sheriff of . . . . . . county, commanding the sheriff as follows:

"WHEREAS, . . . [Quoting body of writ of execution]."

The sale date has been set for . . . . . . . YOU MAY HAVE A RIGHT TO EXEMPT PROPERTY from the sale under statutes of this state, including sections 6.13.010, 6.13.030, 6.13.040, 6.15.010, and 6.15.060 of the Revised Code of Washington, in the manner described in those statutes.

[ 1988 c 231 s 10; 1987 c 442 s 413; 1984 c 276 s 7; 1983 c 3 s 6; 1981 c 193 s 1; Code 1881 s 355; 1877 p 76 s 358; 1869 p 91 s 351; RRS s 578. Formerly RCW 6.04.100.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: CR 4.

Severability—1988 c 231: See note following RCW 6.01.050.

Application—1984 c 276: See note following RCW 6.21.020.